Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; ACADEMIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated in the fiscal years designated from the general fund to the Department of Education. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Minnesota Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs to support academic assistance programs: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The grant recipient must use grant money to support programs designed to improve academic outcomes for youth, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) homework help and tutoring; new text end new text begin (2) continuation and enhancement of the Exact Path program, providing personalized learning pathways in kindergarten through grade 12 math, reading, and language arts based on individual student needs; new text end new text begin (3) literacy and STEM activities; new text end new text begin (4) mentorship initiatives; and new text end new text begin (5) strategies to improve school attendance. new text end new text begin (c) Academic assistance programs must focus on providing a safe and supportive environment where youth who need assistance the most may receive the academic support necessary to succeed. new text end new text begin (d) The Minnesota Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs is encouraged to strengthen partnerships with schools to maximize the impact of the academic assistance programs. new text end new text begin (e) To receive a grant under this section, the Minnesota Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs must secure a 25 percent match from nonstate sources. new text end new text begin (f) Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin (g) The base appropriation for fiscal year 2028 is $0. new text end